Nebraska, session 109, LB109.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB109 LB109
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, any individual or
group sickness and accident insurance policy, certificate, or subscriber
contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any
hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for
policies that provide coverage for a specified disease or other limited-
benefit coverage, any self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not
preempted by federal law, and any pharmacy benefit manager as defined in
section 44-4603, shall not:
(a) Refuse to authorize, approve, or pay a participating provider
for providing covered clinician-administered drugs and related services
to covered persons;
(b) Impose coverage or benefit limitations or require an enrollee to
pay an additional fee, higher copay, higher coinsurance, second copay,
second coinsurance, or other penalty when obtaining clinician-
administered drugs from a health care provider authorized under the laws
of this state to administer clinician-administered drugs or a pharmacy;
(c) Interfere with the right of a patient to choose to obtain a
clinician-administered drug from such patient's provider such as through
inducement, steering, or offering financial or other incentives;
(d) Require clinician-administered drugs to be dispensed by a
pharmacy selected by the insurer;
(e) Limit or exclude coverage for a clinician-administered drug when
such drug is not dispensed by a pharmacy selected by the health plan if
such drug would otherwise be covered;
(f) Reimburse at a lesser amount a clinician-administered drug
dispensed by a pharmacy not selected by the insurer or acquired from an
entity not selected by the insurer;
(g) Condition, deny, restrict, refuse to authorize or approve, or
reduce payment to a participating provider for providing covered
clinician-administered drugs and related services to covered persons when
the participating provider obtains clinician-administered drugs from a
-2-

LB109 LB109
2025 2025
wholesaler, a distributor, an entity, or a pharmacy that is not a
participating provider in the insurer's network, if all criteria for
medical necessity are met;
(h) Require an enrollee to pay an additional fee, higher copay,
higher coinsurance, second copay, second coinsurance, or any other form
of price increase for clinician-administered drugs when not dispensed by
a pharmacy selected by the insurer; or
(i) Require a specialty pharmacy to dispense a clinician-
administered medication directly to a patient with the intention that the
patient will transport the medication to a health care provider for
administration.
(2) Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, any individual or group
sickness and accident insurance policy, certificate, or subscriber
contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any
hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for
policies that provide coverage for a specified disease or other limited-
benefit coverage, any self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not
preempted by federal law, and any pharmacy benefit manager as defined in
section 44-4603, may offer, but shall not require:
(a) The use of a home infusion pharmacy to dispense clinician-
administered drugs to patients in their homes; or
(b) The use of an infusion site external to a patient's provider
office or clinic.
(3) For purposes of this section, clinician-administered drug means
an outpatient prescription drug other than a vaccine that:
(a) Cannot reasonably be self-administered to a patient by such
patient or by an individual assisting the patient with the self-
administration; and
(b) Is typically administered:
(i) By a health care provider authorized under the laws of this
state to administer the drug, including when acting under a physician's
-3-

LB109 LB109
2025 2025
delegation and supervision, or by a pharmacist; and
(ii) In a physician's office, hospital outpatient infusion center,
pharmacy, or other clinical setting.
Sec. 2. Section 44-4606, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
44-4606 (1) A participation contract between a pharmacy benefit
manager and any pharmacist or pharmacy providing prescription drug
coverage for a health benefit plan shall not prohibit or restrict any
pharmacy or pharmacist from or penalize any pharmacy or pharmacist for
disclosing to any covered person any health care information that the
pharmacy or pharmacist deems appropriate regarding:
(a) The nature of treatment, risks, or an alternative to such
treatment;
(b) The availability of an alternate therapy, consultation, or test;
(c) The decision of a utilization reviewer or similar person to
authorize or deny a service;
(d) The process that is used to authorize or deny a health care
service or benefit; or
(e) Information on any financial incentive or structure used by the
health carrier.
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not prohibit a pharmacy or
pharmacist from discussing information regarding the total cost for a
pharmacist service for a prescription drug or from selling a more
affordable alternative to the covered person if a more affordable
alternative is available.
(3) A pharmacy benefit manager contract with a participating
pharmacist or pharmacy shall not prohibit, restrict, or limit disclosure
of information to the director, law enforcement, or a state or federal
governmental official, provided that:
(a) The recipient of the information represents that such recipient
has the authority, to the extent provided by state or federal law, to
-4-

LB109 LB109
2025 2025
maintain proprietary information as confidential; and
(b) Prior to disclosure of information designated as confidential,
the pharmacist or pharmacy:
(i) Marks as confidential any document in which the information
appears; or
(ii) Requests confidential treatment for any oral communication of
the information.
(4) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not terminate the contract with
or penalize a pharmacist or pharmacy due to the pharmacist or pharmacy:
(a) Disclosing information about a pharmacy benefit manager
practice, except information determined to be a trade secret, as
determined by state law or the director; or
(b) Sharing any portion of the pharmacy benefit manager contract
with the director pursuant to a complaint or a query regarding whether
the contract is in compliance with the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure
and Regulation Act.
(5)(a) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not require a covered person
purchasing a covered prescription drug to pay an amount greater than the
lesser of the covered person's cost-sharing amount under the terms of the
health benefit plan or the amount the covered person would pay for the
drug if the covered person were paying the cash price.
(b) Any amount paid by a covered person under subdivision (5)(a) of
this section shall be attributable toward any deductible or, to the
extent consistent with section 2707 of the federal Public Health Service
Act, 42 U.S.C. 300gg-6, as such section existed on January 1, 2022, the
annual out-of-pocket maximum under the covered person's health benefit
plan.
(6)(a) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not restrict a covered
person's ability to choose how a retail community pharmacy may dispense
or deliver prescription drugs.
(b) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not prohibit a retail community
-5-

LB109 LB109
2025 2025
pharmacy from shipping, mailing, or any manner of delivering dispensed
prescription drugs to a covered person at any location requested by the
covered person if such shipping, mailing, or delivery is otherwise
allowed by law.
(c) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not require a retail community
pharmacy to participate in a mail-order contract or a contract with terms
that are substantially similar to a mail-order contract to ship, mail, or
deliver a prescription drug to a covered person.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, retail community pharmacy has
the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-8(k)(10).
(7) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not violate section 1 of this
act.
Sec. 3. Section 44-4610, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
44-4610 A pharmacy benefit manager shall not exclude a Nebraska
pharmacy from participation in the pharmacy benefit manager's specialty
pharmacy network if:
(1) The pharmacy holds a specialty pharmacy accreditation from a
nationally recognized independent accrediting organization; and
(2) The pharmacy is willing to accept reasonable the terms and
conditions of the pharmacy benefit manager's agreement with the pharmacy
benefit manager's specialty pharmacies. Such reasonable terms and
conditions shall not:
(a) Exceed reporting requirements and frequency that are required
for specialty pharmacy accreditation from a nationally recognized
independent accrediting organization;
(b) Exceed performance requirements that are required for specialty
pharmacy accreditation from a nationally recognized independent
accrediting organization; or
(c) Include excessive or punitive fees.
Sec. 4. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
-6-

LB109 LB109
2025 2025
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 5. Original sections 44-4606 and 44-4610, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-